Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1231
Person objecting to treatment; effect.

The Emergency Medical Services Practice Act or the rules or regulations shall not be construed to authorize or require giving any medical treatment to a person who objects to such treatment on religious or other grounds or to authorize the transportation of such person to a medical facility.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5193;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 515.